Hawaii statutes.
[§76-1.5] Executive branch workforce
demographic profile. (a) The director of human resources development
shall compile a profile on the workforce of the executive branch of the State
that shall include:

(1) Demographic data on the entire executive branch
workforce covering both civil service employees hired through recruitment
procedures based on merit and employees exempt from such procedures;

(2) Breakouts of the data required by paragraph (1)
for the systems administered by the department of human resources development,
the board of education, the University of Hawaii board of regents, and the
Hawaii health systems corporation, respectively; and

(3) Information on the number of employees who are
currently eligible for retirement and projected retirements for the succeeding
five years.

(b) The
director of human resources development shall submit an annual profile report
to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each
regular session. [L 2012, c 16, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next